src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-a-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20240214: Csilla)

  Verb - рӯпитаӈкве: # Verb 'to work' - full paradigm
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Inf: рӯпитаӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: рӯпитэ̄гум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: рӯпитэ̄гын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: рӯпиты
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: рӯпитыме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [рӯпитэ̄гын, рӯпитэгы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: рӯпитэ̄г
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: рӯпитэ̄в
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [рӯпитэ̄гын, рӯпитэгы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: рӯпитэ̄гыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg: рӯпитылум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg: рӯпитылын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg: рӯпитытэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg: рӯпитыламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg: [рӯпитылын, рӯпитылы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg: рӯпитытэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg: рӯпитылув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg: [рӯпитылын, рӯпитылы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg: рӯпитыяныл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu: рӯпитыягум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu: рӯпитыягын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu: рӯпитыяге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu: рӯпитыягме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu: [рӯпитыягын, рӯпитыягы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu: рӯпитыяге̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu: рӯпитыягув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu: [рӯпитыягын, рӯпитыягы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu: рӯпитыяганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl: рӯпитыянум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl: [рӯпитыянын, рӯпитыян]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl: рӯпитыянэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl: рӯпитыянаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl: [рӯпитыянын, рӯпитыяны̄н, рӯпитыян]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl: рӯпитыянэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl: рӯпитыянув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl: [рӯпитыянын, рӯпитыяны̄н, рӯпитыян]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl: рӯпитыяныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: рӯпитасум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: рӯпитасын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: рӯпитас
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: рӯпитасме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [рӯпитасын, рӯпитасы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: рӯпитасыг
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: рӯпитасув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [рӯпитасын, рӯпитасы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: рӯпитасыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg: рӯпитаслум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg: рӯпитаслын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg: рӯпитастэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg: рӯпитасламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg: [рӯпитаслын, рӯпитаслы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg: рӯпитастэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg: рӯпитаслув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg: [рӯпитаслын, рӯпитаслы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg: рӯпитасаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu: рӯпитасагум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu: рӯпитасагын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu: рӯпитасаге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu: рӯпитасагме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu: [рӯпитасагын, рӯпитасагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu: рӯпитасаге̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu: рӯпитасагув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu: [рӯпитасагын, рӯпитасагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu: рӯпитасаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl: рӯпитасанум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl: [рӯпитаса̄нын, рӯпитасан]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl: рӯпитасанэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl: [рӯпитасанаме̄н, рӯпитасанме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl: [рӯпитасанын, рӯпитасаны̄н, рӯпитасан]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl: рӯпитасанэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl: рӯпитасанув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl: [рӯпитасанын, рӯпитасаны̄н, рӯпитасан]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl: рӯпитасаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: рӯпитанувум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: рӯпитанувын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: рӯпитанув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: рӯпитануваме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [рӯпитанувын, рӯпитанувы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: рӯпитанувыг
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: рӯпитанувув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [рӯпитанувын, рӯпитанувы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: рӯпитанувыт

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg: рӯпитанувлум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg: рӯпитанувлын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg: рӯпитанувтэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg: рӯпитанувламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg: [рӯпитанувлын, рӯпитанувлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg: рӯпитанувтэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg: рӯпитанувлув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg: [рӯпитанувлын, рӯпитанувлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg: рӯпитануваныл

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu: рӯпитанувагум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu: рӯпитанувагын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu: рӯпитануваге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu: рӯпитанувагме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu: [рӯпитанувагын, рӯпитанувагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu: рӯпитануваге̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu: рӯпитанувагув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu: [рӯпитанувагын, рӯпитанувагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu: рӯпитануваганыл

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl: рӯпитануванум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl: рӯпитануванын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl: рӯпитануванэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl: рӯпитануванме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl: [рӯпитануванын, рӯпитануваны̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl: рӯпитануванэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl: рӯпитануванув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl: [рӯпитануванын, рӯпитануваны̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl: рӯпитануваныл

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: рӯпитэн
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg: [рӯпитэлн, рӯпитэ̄лн]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg: [рӯпитэлн, рӯпитэлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg: [рӯпитэлн, рӯпитэлы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu: [рӯпитэгын, рӯпитэ̄гн]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu: [рӯпитэгын, рӯпитэгы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu: [рӯпитэгын, рӯпитэгы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н, рӯпитэ̄нын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н, рӯпитэ̄нын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н, рӯпитэ̄нын]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: рӯпитавем
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: рӯпитавен
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: рӯпитаве
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: рӯпитавеме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: рӯпитаве̄г
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: рӯпитаве̄в
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: рӯпитавет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: рӯпитаве̄сум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: рӯпитаве̄сын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [рӯпитавес, рӯпитаве̄с]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: рӯпитавесаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [рӯпитавесын, рӯпитавесы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: рӯпитавесы̄г
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: рӯпитавесув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [рӯпитавесын, рӯпитавесы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: рӯпитаве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: рӯпитанувем
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: рӯпитанувен
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: рӯпитануве
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: рӯпитанувеме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [рӯпитанувен, рӯпитануве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: рӯпитануве̄г
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: рӯпитануве̄в
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [рӯпитанувен, рӯпитануве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: рӯпитанувет

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: рӯпитавен
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]

#Present participle
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc: рӯпитанэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1: рӯпитанэм
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2: рӯпитанэн
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3: рӯпитанэ̄тэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1: рӯпитанэме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2: [рӯпитанэн, рӯпитанэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3: рӯпитанэтэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1: [рӯпитанэв, рӯпитанэ̄в]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2: [рӯпитанэн, рӯпитанэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3: рӯпитанэныл

#Present participle, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: рӯпитанэ̄лум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: рӯпитанэ̄лын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: рӯпитанэ̄тэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: рӯпитанэламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: [рӯпитанэ̄лын, рӯпитанэлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: рӯпитанэтэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: рӯпитанэлув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: [рӯпитанэ̄лын, рӯпитанэлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: рӯпитанэ̄ныл

#Present participle, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: рӯпитанэ̄гум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: рӯпитанэ̄гын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: рӯпитанэ̄ге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: рӯпитанэгаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [рӯпитанэ̄гын, рӯпитанэгы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: рӯпитанэге̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: рӯпитанэгув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [рӯпитанэ̄гын, рӯпитанэгагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: рӯпитанэганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: рӯпитанэ̄нум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [рӯпитанэ̄нын, рӯпитанэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: рӯпитанэ̄нэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [рӯпитанэнаме̄н, рӯпитанэнанме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [рӯпитанэны̄н, рӯпитанэныны̄н, рӯпитанэнаны̄н] 
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [рӯпитанэнэ̄н, рӯпитанэнанэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [рӯпитанэнув, рӯпитанэнанув]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [рӯпитанэны̄н, рӯпитанэнаны̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [рӯпитанэ̄ныл, рӯпитанэ̄наныл]
